Maryland, session 2025, HB0043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
24–1302.
(a) There is a Federally Qualified Health Centers Grant Program.
(b) On the recommendation of the Secretary, the Board of Public Works may
make grants to counties, municipal corporations, and nonprofit organizations for:
(1) The conversion of public buildings or parts of public buildings to
federally qualified health centers;
(2) The acquisition of existing buildings or parts of buildings for use as
federally qualified health centers;
(3) The renovation of federally qualified health centers;
(4) The purchase of capital equipment for federally qualified health
centers; [or]
(5) The planning, design, and construction of federally qualified health
centers; OR
– 1 –

Ch. 642 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) THE ACQUISITION OF LAND FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OR USE OF A
FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –